District of Columbia statutes.
8-105.04

Falsifying information.

Any person who knowingly makes any false statement, representation, or certification in any information or data submitted to, or required by, the District or WASA under this subchapter, or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this subchapter, or who falsifies, tampers with, or knowingly renders inaccurate any monitoring device or method, upon conviction, shall be liable for the penalties provided in § 8-105.14.

History

Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-95, § 5, 33 DCR 577
Oct. 26, 2010, D.C. Law 18-256, § 2(c), 57 DCR 8082

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-954.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-256 substituted “the District or WASA” for “the District”.